District of Columbia statutes.
31-4729

Construction of §§ 31-4725 through 31-4730.

Sections 31-4725 through 31-4730 shall not be construed to invalidate a law permitting the use of a policy form which has been filed for the period required by local legislation governing the forms of policies.

History

June 19, 1934, ch. 672, ch. V, § 29
as added Mar. 14, 1985, D.C. Law 5-160, § 3(h), 32 DCR 39

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-535.